de: Montageort des Sensors bzw. Messgeräts: Bremssystem; Fahrzeuginnenraum; Fahrgestell/Unterboden; Kühlsystem; Armaturenbrett/Kombiinstrument; Differential; Motorraum; Auspuffsystem; Stoßstange vorne; Kraftstoffsystem (Leitung/Verteilerrohr); Kraftstofftank; Ansaugsystem; Stoßstange hinten; Getriebe; Radnabe; Windschutzscheibe; Andere
fi: Anturin tai mittarin kiinnityskohta: Jarrujärjestelmä; Matkustamon sisätila; Alusta/pohja; Jäähdytysjärjestelmä; Kojelauta/mittaristo; Tasauspyörästö; Moottoritila; Pakoputkisto; Etupuskuri; Polttoainejärjestelmä (putki/kisko); Polttoainesäiliö; Imujärjestelmä; Takapuskuri; Vaihteisto; Pyörän napa; Tuulilasi; Muu
pt-BR: Sensor ou medidor local de montagem: Sistema de freio; Interior da cabine; Chassi/parte inferior da carroceria; Sistema de resfriamento; Painel/painel de instrumentos; Diferencial; Compartimento do motor; Sistema de escapamento; Para-choque dianteiro; Sistema de combustível (linha/tubulação); Tanque de combustível; Sistema de admissão; Para-choque traseiro; Transmissão; Cubo da roda; Para-brisa; Outros
fr: Emplacement de montage du capteur ou de la jauge: Système de freinage; Habitacle; Châssis/soubassement; Système de refroidissement; Tableau de bord/combiné d'instruments; Différentiel; Compartiment moteur; Système d'échappement; Pare-chocs avant; Système d'alimentation (conduite/rampe); Réservoir de carburant; Système d'admission; Pare-chocs arrière; Transmission; Moyeu de roue; Pare-brise; Autre
en: Sensor or gauge mounting location: Brake system; Cabin interior; Chassis/underbody; Cooling system; Dashboard/instrument cluster; Differential; Engine bay; Exhaust system; Front bumper; Fuel system (line/rail); Fuel tank; Intake system; Rear bumper; Transmission; Wheel hub; Windshield; Other
ko: 센서 또는 게이지 장착 위치: 브레이크 시스템; 객실 내부; 섀시/차체 하부; 냉각 시스템; 대시보드/계기판; 디퍼렌셜; 엔진 베이; 배기 시스템; 프론트 범퍼; 연료 시스템(라인/레일); 연료 탱크; 흡기 시스템; 리어 범퍼; 트랜스미션; 휠 허브; 윈드실드; 기타
ro-RO: Locație de montare pentru senzor sau ceas indicator: Sistem de frânare; Interior cabină; Șasiu/partea inferioară; Sistem de răcire; Tablou de bord/grup de instrumente; Diferențial; Compartiment motor; Sistem de evacuare; Bară de protecție față; Sistem de alimentare (conductă/rampă); Rezervor de combustibil; Sistem de admisie; Bară de protecție spate; Transmisie; Butuc roată; Parbriz; Altele
bg-BG: Място на монтаж на сензора или измервателния уред: Спирачна система; Интериор на кабината; Шаси/долна част; Охладителна система; Арматурно табло/инструментален панел; Диференциал; Двигателен отсек; Изпускателна система; Предна броня; Горивна система (линия/рейка); Резервоар за гориво; Всмукателна система; Задна броня; Скоростна кутия; Главина на колелото; Предно стъкло; Друго
hr-HR: Položaj montaže senzora ili mjerača: Kočioni sustav; Unutrašnjost kabine; Šasija / podvozje; Rashladni sustav; Upravljačka ploča / ploča s instrumentima; Diferencijal; Prostor motora; Ispušni sustav; Prednji branik; Sustav za gorivo (vod / razvodnik); Spremnik za gorivo; Usisni sustav; Stražnji branik; Mjenjač; Glavčina kotača; Vjetrobransko staklo; Ostalo
nl: Sensor- of metermontagelocatie: Remsysteem; Cabine-interieur; Chassis/onderkant; Koelsysteem; Dashboard/instrumentenpaneel; Differentieel; Motorruimte; Uitlaatsysteem; Voorbumper; Brandstofsysteem (leiding/rail); Brandstoftank; Inlaatsysteem; Achterbumper; Transmissie; Wielnaaf; Voorruit; Overig
sv: Monteringsplattor för sensorer eller mätare: Bromssystem; Kupéinteriör; Chassi/underrede; Kylsystem; Instrumentbräda/instrumentgrupp; Differential; Motorrum; Avgassystem; Stötfångare fram; Bränslesystem (ledning/rail); Bränsletank; Insugssystem; Stötfångare bak; Växellåda; Hjulnav; Vindruta; Övrigt
cs: Místo montáže snímače nebo měřidla: Brzdový systém; Interiér kabiny; Podvozek/spodek karoserie; Chladicí systém; Palubní deska / sdružený přístroj; Diferenciál; Motorový prostor; Výfukový systém; Přední nárazník; Palivový systém (vedení/lišta); Palivová nádrž; Sací systém; Zadní nárazník; Převodovka; Náboj kola; Čelní sklo; Jiné
sk-SK: Miesto montáže senzora alebo meracieho prístroja: Brzdový systém; Interiér kabíny; Podvozok; Chladiaci systém; Palubná doska / prístrojová doska; Diferenciál; Motorový priestor; Výfukový systém; Predný nárazník; Palivový systém (vedenie/lišta); Palivová nádrž; Nasávací systém; Zadný nárazník; Prevodovka; Náboj kolesa; Čelné sklo; Iné
ru: Место установки датчика или прибора: Тормозная система; Салон; Шасси/днище; Система охлаждения; Приборная панель/щиток приборов; Дифференциал; Моторный отсек; Выхлопная система; Передний бампер; Топливная система (магистраль/рампа); Топливный бак; Система впуска; Задний бампер; Коробка передач; Ступица колеса; Лобовое стекло; Другое
lt-LT: Jutiklio arba matuoklio montavimo vieta: Stabdžių sistema; Salono vidus; Važiuoklė / kėbulo apačia; Aušinimo sistema; Prietaisų skydelis / skydelio blokas; Diferencialas; Variklio skyrius; Išmetimo sistema; Priekinis buferis; Degalų sistema (linija / magistralė); Degalų bakas; Įsiurbimo sistema; Galinis buferis; Transmisija; Rato stebulė; Priekinis stiklas; Kita
vi: Vị trí lắp đặt cảm biến hoặc đồng hồ đo: Hệ thống phanh; Nội thất cabin; Khung gầm/gầm xe; Hệ thống làm mát; Bảng điều khiển/cụm đồng hồ; Bộ vi sai; Khoang động cơ; Hệ thống ống xả; Cản trước; Hệ thống nhiên liệu (ống/đường ray); Bình nhiên liệu; Hệ thống nạp; Cản sau; Hộp số; Trục bánh xe; Kính chắn gió; Khác
ja: センサーまたはゲージの取り付け位置: ブレーキシステム; 車内; シャーシ/車体下部; 冷却システム; ダッシュボード/インストルメントクラスター; ディファレンシャル; エンジンルーム; 排気システム; フロントバンパー; 燃料システム (ライン/レール); 燃料タンク; 吸気システム; リアバンパー; トランスミッション; ホイールハブ; フロントガラス; その他
pt-PT: Local de montagem do sensor ou do indicador: Sistema de travagem; Interior do habitáculo; Chassis/parte inferior da carroçaria; Sistema de arrefecimento; Painel de bordo/painel de instrumentos; Diferencial; Compartimento do motor; Sistema de escape; Para-choques dianteiro; Sistema de combustível (linha/calha); Depósito de combustível; Sistema de admissão; Para-choques traseiro; Transmissão; Cubo da roda; Para-brisas; Outro
tr: Sensör veya gösterge montaj yeri: Fren sistemi; Kabin içi; Şasi/alt gövde; Soğutma sistemi; Gösterge paneli/gösterge grubu; Diferansiyel; Motor bölmesi; Egzoz sistemi; Ön tampon; Yakıt sistemi (hat/ray); Yakıt deposu; Emme sistemi; Arka tampon; Şanzıman; Tekerlek göbeği; Ön cam; Diğer
zh-TW: 感測器或儀表安裝位置: 煞車系統; 車廂內部; 底盤/車底; 冷卻系統; 儀表板/儀表組; 差速器; 引擎室; 排氣系統; 前保險桿; 燃油系統 (油管/油軌); 油箱; 進氣系統; 後保險桿; 變速箱; 輪轂; 擋風玻璃; 其他
th: เซนเซอร์หรือเกจยึดติด: ระบบเบรก; ภายในห้องโดยสาร; แชสซี/ใต้ท้องรถ; ระบบระบายความร้อน; แดชบอร์ด/แผงหน้าปัด; เฟืองท้าย; ห้องเครื่อง; ระบบไอเสีย; กันชนหน้า; ระบบน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิง (ท่อ/ราง); ถังน้ำมัน; ระบบไอดี; กันชนหลัง; ระบบส่งกำลัง; ดุมล้อ; กระจกหน้ารถ; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 传感器或仪表安装位置: 制动系统; 车厢内部; 底盘/车身底部; 冷却系统; 仪表板/仪表组; 差速器; 发动机舱; 排气系统; 前保险杠; 燃油系统（管路/油轨）; 油箱; 进气系统; 后保险杠; 变速箱; 轮毂; 挡风玻璃; 其他
nb: Monteringssted for sensor eller måler: Bremsesystem; Interiør; Karosseri/understell; Kjølesystem; Dashbord/instrumentpanel; Differensial; Motorrom; Eksosanlegg; Støtfanger foran; Drivstoffsystem (rør/fordelerør); Drivstofftank; Innsugssystem; Støtfanger bak; Girkasse; Hjulnav; Frontrute; Annet
es: Ubicación de montaje del sensor o indicador: Sistema de frenos; Interior de la cabina; Chasis/carrocería inferior; Sistema de enfriamiento; Tablero/panel de instrumentos; Diferencial; Compartimiento del motor; Sistema de escape; Parachoques delantero; Sistema de combustible (línea/riel); Tanque de combustible; Sistema de admisión; Parachoques trasero; Transmisión; Buje de rueda; Parabrisas; Otra
pl: Miejsce montażu czujnika lub wskaźnika: Układ hamulcowy; Wnętrze kabiny; Podwozie/spód nadwozia; Układ chłodzenia; Deska rozdzielcza / zestaw wskaźników; Mechanizm różnicowy; Komora silnika; Układ wydechowy; Przedni zderzak; Układ paliwowy (przewód/listwa); Zbiornik paliwa; Układ dolotowy; Tylny zderzak; Skrzynia biegów; Piasta koła; Szyba przednia; Inne
sl-SI: Mesto montaže senzorja ali merilnika: Zavorni sistem; Notranjost kabine; Šasija/podvozje; Hladilni sistem; Armaturna plošča / instrumentna plošča; Diferencial; Motorni prostor; Izpušni sistem; Sprednji odbijač; Sistem za gorivo (vod/letev); Rezervoar za gorivo; Sesalni sistem; Zadnji odbijač; Menjalnik; Pesto kolesa; Vetrobransko steklo; Drugo
hu: Szenzor vagy műszer rögzítési helye: Fékrendszer; Utastér; Alváz; Hűtőrendszer; Műszerfal / Műszeregység; Differenciálmű; Motortér; Kipufogórendszer; Első lökhárító; Üzemanyag-rendszer (vezeték/elosztócső); Üzemanyagtartály; Szívórendszer; Hátsó lökhárító; Sebességváltó; Kerékagy; Szélvédő; Egyéb
it: Sede di montaggio del sensore o dell'indicatore: Sistema frenante; Interno abitacolo; Telaio/Sottoscocca; Sistema di raffreddamento; Cruscotto/Quadro strumenti; Differenziale; Vano motore; Sistema di scarico; Paraurti anteriore; Sistema di alimentazione (tubo/rail); Serbatoio del carburante; Sistema di aspirazione; Paraurti posteriore; Trasmissione; Mozzo ruota; Parabrezza; Altro
da: Monteringsplacering af sensor eller måler: Bremsesystem; Kabineinteriør; Chassis/undervogn; Kølesystem; Instrumentbræt/instrumentpanel; Differentiale; Motorrum; Udstødningssystem; Forkofanger; Brændstofsystem (slange/fordelerør); Brændstoftank; Indsugningssystem; Bagkofanger; Gearkasse; Hjulnav; Forrude; Andet
el: Θέση τοποθέτησης αισθητήρα ή μετρητή: Σύστημα πέδησης; Εσωτερικό καμπίνας; Σασί/κάτω μέρος αμαξώματος; Σύστημα ψύξης; Ταμπλό/πίνακας οργάνων; Διαφορικό; Χώρος κινητήρα; Σύστημα εξάτμισης; Μπροστινός προφυλακτήρας; Σύστημα καυσίμου (γραμμή/ράγα); Ρεζερβουάρ καυσίμου; Σύστημα εισαγωγής; Πίσω προφυλακτήρας; Κιβώτιο ταχυτήτων; Κέντρο τροχού; Παρμπρίζ; Άλλο